Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-216
Cultured aquatic stock, defined.

Cultured aquatic stock means aquatic organisms raised from privately owned stocks and aquatic organisms lawfully acquired and held in private ownership until they become intermingled with wild aquatic organisms.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 26.